California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(1) Within existing resources, the department shall provide training to regional centers, no less than once every two years, in the availability and requirements of generic, federally funded and private programs available to persons with developmental disabilities, including, but not limited to, eligibility requirements, the application process and covered services, and the appeal process.

(2) Regional centers shall disseminate information and training to all service coordinators regarding the availability and requirements of generic, federally funded, and private insurance
 programs on the local level.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 409, Sec. 49.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4659.1.

(a) If a service or support provided pursuant to a consumer’s individual program plan under this division is paid for, in whole or in part, by the health care service plan or health insurance policy of the consumer’s parent, guardian, or caregiver, the regional center may, when necessary to ensure that the consumer receives the service or support, pay any applicable copayment, coinsurance, or deductible associated with the service or support for which the parent, guardian, or caregiver is responsible if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The consumer is covered by their parent’s, guardian’s, or caregiver’s health care service plan or health insurance policy.

(2) The family has an annual
 gross income that does not exceed 400 percent of the federal poverty level.

(3) There is no other third party having liability for the cost of the service or support, as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 4659 and Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 4659.10).

(b) If a service or support provided to a consumer 18 years of age or older, pursuant to the consumer’s individual program plan, is paid for in whole or in part by the consumer’s health care service plan or health insurance policy, the regional center may, when necessary to ensure that the consumer receives the service or support, pay any applicable copayment, coinsurance, or deductible associated with the service or support for which the consumer is responsible if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The consumer has an annual gross income that
 does not exceed 400 percent of the federal poverty level.

(2) There is no other third party having liability for the cost of the service or support, as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 4659 and Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 4659.10).

(c) If a service or support provided pursuant to a consumer’s individualized family service plan pursuant to the California Early Intervention Services Act (Title 14 (commencing with Section 95000) of the Government Code) is paid for, in whole or in part, by the health care service plan or health insurance policy of the consumer’s parent, guardian, or caregiver, the regional center shall pay any applicable copayment, coinsurance, or deductible associated with the service or support for which the parent, guardian, or caregiver is responsible if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The consumer is covered by their parent’s, guardian’s, or caregiver’s health care service plan or health insurance policy.

(2) There is no other third party having liability for the cost of the service or support, as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 4659 and Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 4659.10). 

(d) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) or paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), a regional center may pay a copayment, coinsurance, or deductible associated with the health care service plan or health insurance policy for a service or support provided pursuant to a consumer’s individual program plan if the family’s or consumer’s income exceeds 400 percent of the federal poverty level, the service or support is necessary to successfully maintain the child at home or the adult consumer in the least-restrictive setting, and the parents or consumer
 demonstrate one or more of the following:

(1) The existence of an extraordinary event that impacts the ability of the parent, guardian, or caregiver to meet the care and supervision needs of the child or impacts the ability of the parent, guardian, or caregiver, or adult consumer with a health care service plan or health insurance policy, to pay the copayment, coinsurance, or deductible.

(2) The existence of catastrophic loss that temporarily limits the ability to pay of the parent, guardian, or caregiver, or adult consumer with a health care service plan or health insurance policy and creates a direct economic impact on the family or adult consumer. For purposes of this paragraph, catastrophic loss may include, but is not limited to, natural disasters and accidents involving major injuries to an immediate family member.

(3) Significant unreimbursed medical costs associated with the care of the consumer or another child who is also a regional center consumer.

(e) The parent, guardian, or caregiver of a consumer or an adult consumer with a health care service plan or health insurance policy shall self-certify the family’s gross annual income to the regional center by providing copies of W-2 Wage Earners Statements, payroll stubs, a copy of the prior year’s state income tax return, or other documents and proof of other income.

(f) The parent, guardian, or caregiver of a consumer or an adult consumer with a health care service plan or health insurance policy is responsible for notifying the regional center when a change in income occurs that would result in a change in eligibility for coverage of the health care service plan or health insurance policy copayments, coinsurance, or
 deductibles.

(g) Documentation submitted pursuant to this section shall be considered records obtained in the course of providing intake, assessment, and services and shall be confidential pursuant to Section 4514.

(h) This section shall not be implemented in a manner that is inconsistent with the requirements of Part C of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1431 et seq.).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 28, Sec. 24.   (SB 81)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4659.2.

(a) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Physical restraint” means any behavioral or mechanical restraint, as defined in Section 1180.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “Chemical restraint” means a drug that is used to control behavior and that is used in a manner not required to treat the patient’s medical conditions.

(3) “Seclusion” means involuntary confinement of a person alone in a room or an area as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 1180.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) “Long-term health care facility” means a facility, as
 defined in Section 1418 of the Health and Safety Code, that is required to report to a regional center pursuant to Section 54327 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(5) “Acute psychiatric hospital” means a facility, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, including an institution for mental disease, that is a regional center vendor.

(6) “Regional center vendor” means an agency, individual, or service provider that a regional center has approved to provide vendored or contracted services or supports pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 4648.

(7) “Community crisis home” means a facility, as defined in Section 4698, that is a regional center vendor.

(8) “Mental health rehabilitation
 center” means a residential facility that is licensed by the State Department of Health Care Services and is a regional center vendor.

(b) (1) All regional center vendors that provide crisis or residential services or supported living services, including community crisis homes and mental health rehabilitation centers, long-term health care facilities, and acute psychiatric hospitals shall report to the agency designated pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 4900 all of the following:

(A) Each death or serious injury of a person occurring during, or related to, the use of seclusion, physical restraint, or chemical restraint, or any combination thereof.

(B) Any unexpected or suspicious death, regardless of whether the cause is immediately known.

(C) Any allegation of sexual assault, as defined in Section 15610.63, in which the alleged perpetrator is a staff member, service provider, or facility employee or contractor.

(D) Any report made to the local law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction in which the facility is located that involves physical abuse, as defined in Section 15610.63, in which a staff member, service provider, or facility employee or contractor is implicated.

(2) The reports described in paragraph (1) shall be made no later than the close of the business day following the death or serious injury. The report shall include the encrypted identifier of the person involved, and the name, street address, and telephone number of the facility.

(c) (1) On a monthly basis, all regional center vendors that provide
 crisis or residential services or supported living services, long-term health care facilities, and acute psychiatric hospitals shall report to the State Department of Developmental Services, the regional center providing services to the consumer, the vendoring regional center, if different, and the agency designated pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 4900 all of the following:

(A) The number of incidents of seclusion and the duration of time spent per incident in seclusion.

(B) The number of incidents of the use of behavioral restraints and the duration of time spent per incident of restraint.

(C) The number of times an involuntary emergency medication is used to control behavior.

(2) The reports required pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include the
 name, street address, and telephone number of the facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 21.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Interagency Dispute Resolution [4659.5. - 4659.8.]

4659.5.

(a) This article shall apply to any dispute over the provision of services where the regional center believes that a generic agency, as defined in subdivision (g), is legally obligated to fund or provide a service or services that are contained in the individualized family service plan or individual program plan for any child under six years of age.

(b) This article shall apply only to disputes over which entity is to deliver or pay for a specific type, frequency, or duration of services, or any combination thereof, when the services are contained in the individualized family service plan or individual program plan for any child under six years of age. This article shall not apply to the resolution of disputes
 between a consumer or his or her authorized representative and a regional center over the provision of, or payment for, a service, nor shall this article apply to the determination of eligibility for any service.

(c) This article does not apply when the dispute has been decided after a due process hearing or resolved by the agreement of all parties, in a proceeding under the California Early Intervention Services Act (Title 14 (commencing with Section 95000) of the Government Code) in which the regional center and local educational agency have been joined.

(d) This article does not apply to a dispute over the type, frequency, and duration of service when a consumer has requested mediation or a due process hearing under the California Early Intervention Services Act (Title 14 (commencing with Section 95000) of the
 Government Code) and the regional center and local educational agency have been joined in the proceeding.

(e) This article does not modify the mandated responsibility of a regional center or a local educational agency to fund services identified in the individualized family service plan as set forth in subdivisions (b) to (e), inclusive, of Section 95014 of the Government Code and Sections 52106 to 52110, inclusive, of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(f) This article does not modify the responsibilities of regional centers to fund services pursuant to this division.

(g) For purposes of this article, “generic agency” means a publicly funded agency referred to in paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 4648,
 except that the term does not apply to Medi-Cal specialty mental health plans that are governed by dispute resolution processes outlined in Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 1810.100) of Division 1 of Title 9 of the California Code of Regulations, an individual, organization, or entity operating under a Medi-Cal managed care plan contract with the State Department of Health Care Services under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of Part 3 of Division 9, the Genetically Handicapped Persons Program, administered by the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 125125) of Chapter 2 of Part 5 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code, or to the California Children’s Services Program administered by the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 123800) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 84, Sec. 1.   (AB 140)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4659.7.

(a) Whenever a regional center believes that a generic agency is responsible for providing or paying for a service required pursuant to Sections 4646.5 to 4648, inclusive, or Section 95020 of the Government Code and specified in the consumer’s individualized family service plan or individual program plan, and the generic agency is not providing or funding the service or services, the regional center may submit a written notification of the failure to provide the service and a request for dispute resolution to the appropriate generic agency. Any regional center that files written notification of the failure to provide a service and a request for dispute resolution with a generic agency as set forth in this section, shall provide written notification of its request for resolution to the consumer’s parent,
 legal guardian, or authorized representative. The regional center may withdraw its request for dispute resolution at any time during this process.

(b) (1) Upon receipt of the written notification made by the regional center, the generic agency and the regional center shall have 15 calendar days to meet to resolve the dispute unless the generic agency notifies the regional center in writing that it needs additional time, up to 15 days, to make an initial assessment of whether the child meets the basic eligibility requirements for the program or type of service in question.

(2) The generic agency and the regional center shall prepare a written copy of the meeting resolution which shall be mailed to the parent, guardian, or other authorized representative within 10 calendar days of the meeting. The resolution shall specify
 the regional center or generic agency responsible for providing the service.

(c) (1) If the dispute cannot be resolved to the satisfaction of the regional center and the generic agency, within 10 calendar days of the meeting, each party shall submit his or her contentions on the issue in writing to the Director of the Office of Administrative Hearings within 30 calendar days of the meeting. The Director of the Office of Administrative Hearings, or his or her designee, shall review the issue and issue a written decision within 30 calendar days of receipt of the case. The decision shall specify the regional center or generic agency responsible for the service or services. The Office of Administrative Hearings may award reimbursement retroactively to the date the prevailing party initiated the provision of the services that were in dispute. A written copy of the resolution shall be mailed to the parent, guardian, or
 authorized representative, the Director of Developmental Services, the regional center, and the generic agency involved in the dispute resolution process.

(2) The decision of the Director of the Office of Administrative Hearings, or his or her designee, shall be the final administrative decision for all agencies that are parties to the dispute.

(3) Nothing in this article shall be construed to supersede regional center or generic agency procedures for subsequent review and modification, as appropriate, of the type, frequency, or duration of services pursuant to the agency’s program or treatment planning process.

(d) (1) The submission of a notification pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not interfere with a consumer’s right to
 receive the services and supports in his or her individualized family service plan or individual program plan on a timely basis.

(2) Arrangements for the provision of an interim service or services may be made by written agreement between the regional center and the generic agency, provided the child’s individualized family service plan or individual program plan is not altered, except as to which agency delivers or pays for the service if the service or services are included in the individualized family service plan or individual program plan.

(e) Nothing in this section shall prevent a consumer or his or her authorized representative from pursuing administrative remedies otherwise available, including remedies pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 4700) of Division 4.5, of this code or Sections 52160 to 52174,
 inclusive, of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations or, after exhaustion of any applicable administrative remedies, pursuing available remedies through a civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(f) Once the dispute resolution procedures have been completed, the agency determined responsible for the service shall pay for and provide the service, and shall reimburse the other agency that provided the service pursuant to subdivision (d), if applicable.

(g) The State Department of Developmental Services shall pay for the services provided by the Office of Administrative Hearings pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 84, Sec. 1.   (AB 140)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4659.8.

The resolution under this article of whether a regional center or generic agency is the responsible party for providing the service in a particular matter shall not set a precedent for the resolution of any other matter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 84, Sec. 1.   (AB 140)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.6. Third-Party Liability [4659.10. - 4659.24.]

4659.10.

It is the intent of the Legislature that this article shall be implemented consistent with the responsibilities of the department and the regional centers to provide services and supports pursuant to the requirements of this division and the California Early Intervention Program. It is further the intent of the Legislature that the department and the regional centers shall continue to be the payers of last resort consistent with the requirements of this division and the California Early Intervention Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 9, Sec. 14.   (SB 74)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4659.11.

(a) When services are provided or will be provided to a consumer under this division, or to a child under 36 months of age who is eligible for the California Early Intervention Program pursuant to Title 14 (commencing with Section 95000) of the Government Code, as a result of an injury for which another person is liable, or for which an insurance carrier is liable in accordance with the provisions of any policy of insurance issued pursuant to Section 11580.2 of the Insurance Code, the department or the regional center from which the individual obtained services shall have a right to recover from the person or carrier the reasonable value of services so provided. To enforce that right, the department or the regional center may institute and prosecute legal
 proceedings against the third person or carrier who may be liable for the injury in an appropriate court, either in the name of the department or regional center or in the name of the child or consumer, his or her guardian, conservator, limited conservator, personal representative, estate, or survivors.

(b) The department and the regional center may compromise, or settle and release a claim as described in subdivision (a).

(c) The department may waive a claim as described in subdivision (a), in whole or in part, if the department determines that collection would not be cost efficient, would result in undue hardship upon the consumer or child who suffered the injury, or in a wrongful death action upon the heirs of the deceased.

(d) No action taken on behalf of the department or the regional center pursuant to this
 section or any judgment rendered in that action shall be a bar to any action upon the claim or cause of action of the child or consumer, his or her guardian, conservator, personal representative, estate, dependents, or survivors against the third party who may be liable for the injury, or shall operate to deny to the child or consumer the recovery for that portion of any damages not covered hereunder.

(e) The department, the State Department of Health Care Services, and the Department of Managed Health Care shall work together to ensure that the recovery sought by the department, regional centers, and the State Department of Health Care Services for services for Medi-Cal beneficiaries with developmental disabilities is appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 9, Sec. 14.   (SB 74)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4659.12.

(a) Where an action is brought by the department or a regional center pursuant to Section 4659.11, it shall be commenced within the period prescribed in Section 338 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(b) The death of a consumer or child under 36 months of age who is eligible for the California Early Intervention Program does not abate any right of action established by Section 4659.11.

(c) When an action or claim is brought by a person or persons entitled to bring the action or assert the claim against a third party who may be liable for causing the death of the child or consumer, any settlement, judgment, or award obtained is subject to
 the right of the department or the regional center to recover from that party the reasonable value of the services provided to the consumer under this division.

(d) Where the action or claim is brought by the child or consumer alone, and the child or consumer incurs a personal liability to pay attorney’s fees and costs of litigation, the claim for reimbursement by the department or the regional center of the services provided to the child or consumer shall be limited to the reasonable value of services less 25 percent, which represents the department’s or the regional center’s reasonable share of attorney’s fees paid by the child or consumer, and that portion of the cost of litigation expenses determined by multiplying by the ratio of the full amount of the reasonable value of services so provided to the full amount of the judgment, award, or settlement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 9, Sec. 14.   (SB 74)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4659.13.

(a) If a consumer or child under 36 months of age who is eligible for the California Early Intervention Program pursuant to Title 14 (commencing with Section 95000) of the Government Code, the department, or a regional center brings an action or claim against a third party or carrier, the consumer, child, regional center, or department, within 30 days of filing the action, shall provide the other persons or entities specified in this subdivision with written notice by personal service or registered mail of the action or claim, and of the name of the court or state or local agency in which the action or claim is brought. Proof of the notice shall be filed in the action or claim. If an action or claim is brought by the department, the regional center, the child, or the consumer, any of the other persons or entities described in
 this subdivision, at any time before trial on the facts, may become a party to, or shall consolidate their action or claim with, another action or claim if brought independently.

(b) If an action or claim is brought by the department or the regional center pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4659.11, written notice to the child, consumer, guardian, conservator, personal representative, estate, or survivor given pursuant to this section shall advise him or her of his or her right to intervene in the proceeding, his or her right to obtain a private attorney of his or her choice, and the department’s right to recover the reasonable value of the services provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 198.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4659.14.

In the event of judgment or award in a suit or claim against a third party or carrier:

(a) If the action or claim is prosecuted by the child or consumer alone, the court or agency shall first order paid from any judgment or award the reasonable litigation expenses incurred in preparation and prosecution of the action or claim, together with reasonable attorney’s fees, when an attorney has been retained. After payment of these expenses and attorney’s fees the court or agency, on the application of the department or the regional center, shall allow as a lien against the amount of the settlement, judgment, or award, the reasonable value of additional services provided to the child under the California Early Intervention
 Program or consumer under this division, as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 4659.12.

(b) If the action or claim is prosecuted both by the consumer or child and the department or regional center, the court or agency shall first order paid from any judgment or award the reasonable litigation expenses incurred in preparation and prosecution of the action or claim, together with reasonable attorney’s fees based solely on the services rendered for the benefit of the child or consumer. After payment of these expenses and attorney’s fees, the court or agency shall apply out of the balance of the judgment or award an amount sufficient to reimburse the department the full amount of the reasonable value of services provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 9, Sec. 14.   (SB 74)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4659.15.

Upon further application at any time before the judgment or award is satisfied, the court shall allow as a further lien the reasonable value of additional services provided arising out of the same cause of action or claim provided on behalf of the consumer under this division, or child under the California Early Intervention Program, where the services were provided or became payable subsequent to the original order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 9, Sec. 14.   (SB 74)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4659.16.

(a) No settlement, judgment, or award in any action or claim by a consumer or child to recover damages for injuries, where the department or regional center has an interest, shall be deemed final or satisfied without first giving the department notice and a reasonable opportunity to perfect and to satisfy the department’s or regional center’s lien. Recovery of the lien from an injured consumer’s or child’s action or claim is limited to that portion of a settlement, judgment, or award that represents payment for services provided on behalf of the consumer under this division or a child under the California Early Intervention Program. All reasonable efforts shall be made to obtain the department’s advance agreement to a determination as to what portion of a
 settlement, judgment, or award represents payment for services provided on behalf of the consumer under this division or the child under the California Early Intervention Program. Absent the department’s advance agreement as to what portion of a settlement, judgment, or award represents payment for medical expenses, or medical care, provided to the child or consumer, the matter shall be submitted to a court for decision. The department, the regional center, or the child or consumer may seek resolution of the dispute by filing a motion, which shall be subject to regular law and motion procedures.

(b) If the child or consumer has filed a third-party action or claim, the court in which the action or claim was filed shall have jurisdiction over a dispute between the department or regional center and the child or consumer regarding the amount of a lien asserted pursuant to this section that is based upon an allocation of damages contained in a
 settlement or compromise of the third-party action or claim. If no third-party action or claim has been filed, any superior court in California where venue would have been proper, had a claim or action been filed, shall have jurisdiction over the motion. The motion may be filed as a special motion and treated as an ordinary law and motion proceeding subject to regular motion fees. The reimbursement determination motion shall be treated as a special proceeding of a civil nature pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 1063) of the Code of Civil Procedure. When no action is pending, the person making the motion shall be required to pay a first appearance fee. When an action is pending, the person making the motion shall pay a regular law and motion fee. Notwithstanding Section 1064 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the child or consumer, the regional center, or the department may appeal the final findings, decision, or order.

(c) The court shall
 issue its findings, decision, or order, which shall be considered the final determination of the parties’ rights and obligations with respect to the department’s lien, unless the settlement is contingent on an acceptable allocation of the settlement proceeds, in which case, the court’s findings, decision, or order shall be considered a tentative determination. If the child or consumer does not serve notice of a rejection of the tentative determination, which shall be based solely upon a rejection of the contingent settlement, within 30 days of the notice of entry of the court’s tentative determination, subject to further consideration by the court pursuant to subdivision (d), the tentative determination shall become final. Notwithstanding Section 1064 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the child, consumer, regional center, or department may appeal the final findings, decision, or order.

(d) If the consumer or child does not accept the tentative
 determination, which shall be based solely upon a rejection of the contingent settlement, any party may subsequently seek further consideration of the court’s findings upon application to modify the prior findings, decision, or order based on new or different facts or circumstances. The application shall include an affidavit showing what application was made before, when, and to what judge, what order or decision was made, and what new or different facts or circumstances, including a different settlement, are claimed to exist. Upon further consideration, the court may modify the allocation in the interest of fairness and for good cause.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 9, Sec. 14.   (SB 74)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4659.17.

When the department or regional center has perfected a lien upon a judgment or award in favor of a child eligible for the California Early Intervention Program or a consumer against any third party for an injury for which the consumer has received services pursuant to this division, the department or the regional center shall be entitled to a writ of execution as lien claimant to enforce payment of the lien against the third party with interest and other accruing costs as in the case of other executions. In the event the amount of the judgment or award so recovered has been paid to the child or consumer, the department or the regional center shall be entitled to a writ of execution against the child or consumer to the extent of the department’s or the regional center’s lien, with
 interest and other accruing costs as in the case of other executions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 9, Sec. 14.   (SB 74)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4659.18.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in no event shall the department or the regional center recover an amount greater than the child eligible for the California Early Intervention Program or consumer recovers after deducting from the settlement judgment, or award, attorney’s fees and litigation costs paid for by the child or consumer. If the recovery of the department or regional center is determined under this section, the reductions in subdivision (d) of Section 4659.12 shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 9, Sec. 14.   (SB 74)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4659.19.

The amount recovered by the department or regional center shall not exceed the amount derived from applying Section 4659.12, 4659.16, or 4659.18, whichever is less.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 9, Sec. 14.   (SB 74)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4659.20.

In the event that the child or consumer, his or her guardian, conservator, limited conservator, personal representative, estate, or survivors, or any of them brings an action against the third party that may be liable for the injury, notice of institution of legal proceedings, notice of settlement, and all other notices required by this article shall be given to the director of the department in Sacramento except in cases where the director specifies that notice shall be given to the Attorney General. All notices shall be given by insurance carriers, as described in Section 14124.70, having liability for the child’s or consumer’s claim, and by the attorney retained to assert the claim by the consumer or child, or by the injured child or consumer, his or her guardian, conservator,
 limited conservator, personal representative, estate, or survivors, if no attorney is retained.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 9, Sec. 14.   (SB 74)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4659.21.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all carriers described in Section 14124.70, including automobile, casualty, property, and malpractice insurers, shall enter into agreements with regional centers and the department to permit and assist the matching of the eligibility files of the department and the regional centers against the carrier’s claim files, utilizing, if necessary, social security numbers as common identifiers for the purpose of determining whether services were provided to a child eligible for the California Early Intervention Program or consumer because of an injury for which another person is liable, or for which a carrier is liable in accordance with the provisions of any policy of insurance. The carrier shall maintain a centralized file of claimants’ names,
 mailing addresses, and social security numbers or dates of birth. This information shall be made available to the department and the regional center upon a reasonable request by the department or a regional center. The agreement described in this section shall include financial arrangements for reimbursing carriers for necessary costs incurred in furnishing requested information.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 9, Sec. 14.   (SB 74)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4659.22.

(a) Every health insurer, self-insured plan, group health plan, as defined in Section 607(1) of the federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq.), service benefit plan, managed care organization, including health care service plans as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 1345 of the Health and Safety Code, licensed pursuant to the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code), pharmacy benefit manager, or other party that is, by statute, contract, or agreement, legally responsible for payment of a claim for a health care item or service, upon request of the department or a regional center for any records, or any information contained
 in records pertaining to, an individual or group health insurance policy or plan issued by the insurer or plan against, or pertaining to, the services paid by or claims made against the insurer or plans under a policy or plan, shall make the requested records or information available upon a certification by the department or regional center that the individual is an applicant for or recipient of services under this division, is an applicant for or recipient of services under the California Early Intervention Program, or is a person who is legally responsible for the applicant or recipient, provided that the department and regional center certifies its compliance with all state and federal laws pertaining to the confidentiality of medical information.

(b) The department or regional center shall enter into a cooperative agreement setting forth mutually agreeable procedures for requesting and furnishing appropriate information, consistent with
 laws pertaining to the confidentiality and privacy of medical information. These procedures shall include any financial arrangements as may be necessary to reimburse insurers or plans for necessary costs incurred in furnishing requested information, and the time and manner those procedures are to become effective. The department shall make every effort to coordinate with the State Department of Health Care Services to obtain this information for this purpose, avoid duplication and administrative costs, and to protect privacy of medical information pursuant to state and federal law.

(c) The information required to be made available pursuant to this section shall be limited to information necessary to determine whether health care services have been or should have been claimed and paid pursuant to an obligation of entities identified in subdivision (a) and the terms and conditions of the enrollee’s contract or, in the case of a Medi-Cal
 beneficiary, pursuant to the scope of the contract between the State Department of Health Care Services and a Medi-Cal managed care health plan, with respect to services received by a particular individual for which services under this division or under the California Early Intervention Program would be available.

(d) Not later than the date upon which the procedures agreed to pursuant to subdivision (b) become effective, the director shall establish guidelines to ensure that information relating to an individual certified to be an applicant child or consumer, furnished to any insurer or plan pursuant to this section, is used only for the purpose of identifying the records or information requested in the manner so as not to violate the confidentiality of an applicant or recipient.

(e) The department shall implement this section no later than July 1, 2011.
